Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; THIEF RIVER FALLS HISTORIC SITES.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the art and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of Thief River Falls. Of this amount, $750,000 is for HVAC work; roof repairs, including facia and gutter replacement; and installing energy-efficient windows and doors in the historic Soo Line Depot. The remaining $250,000 is to repair the roof, replace the HVAC system, and install energy-efficient windows at the historic Carnegie Library. Both buildings are on the National Register of Historic Places and are owned by the city of Thief River Falls. All work must follow the standards outlined in the United States Secretary of Interior's Treatment of Historical Properties. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the projects are completed. new text end